Massachusetts, session 194th, H1183.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Section 15, § 6, is hereby replaced by the following: 
Section 6. Each application for a license shall be accompanied by an investigation fee. 
Investigation and license fees shall be determined annually by the secretary of administration 
under section 3B of chapter 7 provided that such total annual fees shall be not less than $500 for 
licensees of non-Massachusetts Corporations and not less than $300 for licensees of 
Corporations headquartered within the Commonwealth of Massachusetts; provided further, that 
such investigation and license fees shall not apply to any community development corporation as 
defined in section 1 of chapter 40F and organized under the General Laws. The license of a 
mortgage loan originator shall expire annually. Each licensee, shall annually, on or before a date 
to be determined by the commissioner, submit a license renewal application. The license renewal 
application shall be on a form prescribed by the commissioner, signed under the pains and 
penalties of perjury, containing such information as the commissioner may require.